Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 8. Dissolution.

§79-29-801.
Nonjudicial dissolution.

A limited liability company is dissolved and its affairs must be wound up upon the first of the following to occur:

At the time specified in the certificate of formation;

Upon the occurrence of the event specified in the certificate of formation or the written operating agreement;

Upon the consent of all members, or such lesser number as may be provided in the certificate of formation or operating agreement;

At any time there are no members; provided, that the limited liability company is not dissolved and is not required to be wound up if:

Within one hundred eighty (180) days or such other period as is provided for in the certificate of formation or operating agreement after the occurrence of the event that terminated the continued membership of the last remaining member, the personal representative of the last remaining member agrees in writing to continue the limited liability company and to the admission of the personal representative of the member or its nominee or designee to the limited liability company as a member, effective as of the occurrence of the event that terminated the continued membership of the last remaining member; however, an operating agreement may provide that the personal representative of the last remaining member shall be obligated to agree in writing to continue the limited liability company and to the admission of the personal representative of such member or its nominee or designee to the limited liability company as a member, effective as of the occurrence of the event that terminated the continued membership of the last remaining member; or

A member is admitted to the limited liability company in the manner provided in the operating agreement, effective as of the occurrence of the event that terminated the continued membership of the last remaining member, within one hundred eighty (180) days or such other period as is provided in the operating agreement after the occurrence of the event that terminated the continued membership of the last remaining member, pursuant to a provision of the operating agreement that specifically provides for the admission of a member to the limited liability company after there is no longer a remaining member of the limited liability company.

Upon the entry of a decree of judicial dissolution under Section 79-29-803.

The following events with respect to any member shall not cause the limited liability company to be dissolved or its affairs to be wound up, and upon the occurrence of any such event, the limited liability company shall be continued without dissolution:

Death;

Withdrawal;

Expulsion;

Bankruptcy;

Dissolution; or

The occurrence of any other event that terminates the continued membership of any member.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-801 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 48; Laws, 1998, ch. 376, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1998; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to nonjudicial dissolution. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

§79-29-802.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, §§ 3 and 4, effective January 1, 2011.

§79-29-802. [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 49, eff from and after July 1, 1994.]

Former § 79-29-802 was entitled: Judicial dissolution. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-803.

§79-29-803.
Judicial dissolution.

On application by or for a member, the chancery court for the county in which the principal office of the limited liability company is located, or the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the limited liability company does not have a principal office in this state, may decree dissolution of a limited liability company:

Whenever it is not reasonably practicable to carry on the business in conformity with the certificate of formation or the operating agreement;

Whenever the managers or the members in control of the limited liability company have been guilty of or have knowingly countenanced persistent and pervasive fraud or abuse of authority, or the property of the limited liability company is being misapplied or wasted by such persons; or

In a proceeding by the limited liability company to have its voluntary dissolution continued under court supervision.

If a limited liability company has no members due to the expulsion or withdrawal of the last remaining member pursuant to the terms of the certificate of formation or the written operating agreement and the certificate of formation or the written operating agreement of the limited liability company prohibits the substitution of a member, then an officer, manager or any assignee or owner of a financial interest of the limited liability company or the personal representative of the member may apply to the chancery court to dissolve the limited liability company; however, if there are no persons that hold the above-described positions, then any creditor of the limited liability company or the Secretary of State may apply to the chancery court to dissolve the limited liability company.

A court in a judicial proceeding brought to dissolve a limited liability company may appoint one or more receivers to wind-up and liquidate, or one or more custodians to manage, the business and affairs of the limited liability company. The court appointing a receiver or custodian has jurisdiction over the limited liability company and all its property wherever located. The court may appoint an individual or entity (authorized to transact business in this state) as a receiver or custodian. The court may require the receiver or custodian to post bond, with or without sureties, in an amount the court directs.

The court shall describe the powers and duties of the receiver or custodian in its appointing order, which may be amended from time to time. Among other powers:

The receiver (i) may dispose of all or any part of the assets of the limited liability company wherever located, at a public or private sale, if authorized by the court; and (ii) may sue and defend in the receiver’s own name as receiver of the limited liability company in all courts of this state; and

The custodian may exercise all the powers of the limited liability company, through or in place of its members, managers or officers, to the extent necessary to manage the affairs of the limited liability company in the best interests of its members and creditors.

The court during a receivership may redesignate the receiver a custodian, and during a custodianship may redesignate the custodian a receiver, if doing so is in the best interests of the limited liability company, its members and creditors.

The court from time to time during the receivership or custodianship may order compensation paid and expenses paid or reimbursed to the receiver or custodian from the assets of the limited liability company or proceeds from the sale of the assets.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 112, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

A former § 79-29-803 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 50, eff from and after July 1, 1994; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to winding up. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-809.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “principal office of the limited liability company is located, or the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the limited liability company does not have a principal office in this state, may decree” for “the registered office of the limited liability company is located may decree” in (1); and made minor stylistic changes in (2).

Commencement of proceeding under this section to dissolve a professional limited liability company, see § 79-29-923.

§79-29-804.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, §§ 3 and 4, effective January 1, 2011.

§79-29-804. [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 51, eff from and after July 1, 1994.]

Former § 79-29-804 was entitled: Agency power of managers or members after dissolution. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-811.

§79-29-805.
Decree; winding-up, liquidation, notification.

If after a hearing the court determines that one or more grounds for judicial dissolution exist, it may enter a decree dissolving the limited liability company and specifying the effective date of the dissolution, and the clerk of the court shall deliver a certified copy of the decree to the Secretary of State who shall file it.

After entering the decree of dissolution, the court shall direct the winding-up and liquidation of the limited liability company’s business and affairs in accordance with Section 79-29-809 and the notification of claimants in accordance with Sections 79-29-817 and 79-29-819.

Nothing contained in this section shall diminish the inherent equity powers of the court to fashion alternative remedies to judicial dissolution.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-805 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 52, eff from and after July 1, 1994; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to distribution of assets. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-813.

§79-29-806.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, §§ 3 and 4, effective January 1, 2011.

§79-29-806. [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 53, eff from and after July 1, 1994.]

Former § 79-29-806 was entitled: Known claims against dissolved limited liability company. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-817.

§79-29-807.
Safekeeping by State Treasurer.

Assets of a dissolved limited liability company that should be transferred to a creditor, claimant or member of the limited liability company who cannot be found shall be reduced to cash and deposited with the State Treasurer for safekeeping.When the creditor, claimant or member furnishes satisfactory proof of entitlement to the amount deposited, the State Treasurer shall pay such person or the person’s personal representative that amount.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-807 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 54, eff from and after July 1, 1994; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to unknown claims against dissolved limited liability company. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.
For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-819.

§79-29-809.
Winding-up.

A manager who has not wrongfully dissolved a limited liability company or, if none, the members or a person approved by the members or, if there is more than one (1) class or group of members, then by each class or group of members, in either case, by members who own more than fifty percent (50%) of the then current percentage or other interest in the profits of the limited liability company owned by all of the members or by the members in each class or group, as appropriate, may wind-up the limited liability company’s affairs; but the chancery court upon cause shown, may wind-up the limited liability company’s affairs upon application of any member or manager, the member’s or manager’s personal representative or assignee, and in connection therewith, may appoint a liquidating trustee.

Upon dissolution of a limited liability company, the persons winding-up the limited liability company’s affairs may, in the name of, and for and on behalf of, the limited liability company, prosecute and defend suits, whether civil, criminal or administrative, gradually settle and close the limited liability company’s business, dispose of and convey the limited liability company’s property, discharge or make reasonable provision for the limited liability company’s liabilities, and distribute to the members any remaining assets of the limited liability company, all without affecting the liability of members and managers and without imposing liability on a liquidating trustee.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

Distribution of assets upon the winding up of a limited liability company, see § 79-29-813.

Real properties listed as being owned by debtor’s LLC in a prior bankruptcy were not property of debtor’s Chapter 13 estate under 11 U.S.C.S. § 541(a)(1) because under the statute debtor had not automatically obtained legal title to the properties upon the LLC’s dissolution, so the properties were not protected from foreclosure. Netterville v. Planters Bank & Trust Co. (In re Netterville), — B.R. —, 2019 Bankr. LEXIS 2294 (Bankr. N.D. Miss. July 24, 2019).

§79-29-811.
Agency power of managers, officers or members after dissolution.

Except as provided in subsections (3), (4) and (5) of this section, after an event causing dissolution of the limited liability company, any member can bind the limited liability company:

By any act appropriate for winding-up the limited liability company’s affairs or completing transactions unfinished at dissolution; and

By any transaction that would have bound the limited liability company if it had not been dissolved, if the other party to the transaction does not have notice of the dissolution.

The filing of the certificate of dissolution shall be presumed to constitute notice of dissolution for purposes of subsection (1)(b) of this section.

An act of a manager, officer or member which is not binding on the limited liability company pursuant to subsection (1) of this section is binding if it is otherwise authorized by the limited liability company.

An act of a manager, officer or member which would be binding under subsection (1) or would be otherwise authorized but which is in contravention of a restriction on authority shall not bind the limited liability company to persons having knowledge of the restriction.

If the certificate of formation or the operating agreement vests management of the limited liability company in a manager or managers, the manager or managers shall have the authority of a member provided for in subsection (1) of this section, and no member shall have such authority if the member is acting solely in the capacity of a member.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

§79-29-813.
Distribution of assets.

Upon the winding-up of a limited liability company, the assets shall be distributed as follows:

To creditors, including members and managers who are creditors, to the extent otherwise permitted by law, in satisfaction of liabilities of the limited liability company, whether by payment or the making of reasonable provision for payment thereof, other than liabilities for which reasonable provision for payment has been made and liabilities for distributions to members and former members under Section 79-29-601 or Section 79-29-603;

To members and former members in satisfaction of liabilities for distributions under Section 79-29-601 or Section 79-29-603; and

To members first for the return of their contributions and second respecting their financial interests, in the proportions in which the members share in distributions.

A limited liability company which has dissolved:

Shall pay or make reasonable provision to pay all claims and obligations, including all contingent, conditional or unmatured contractual claims, known to the limited liability company;

Shall make such provision as will be reasonably likely to be sufficient to provide compensation for any claim against the limited liability company which is the subject of a pending action, suit or proceeding to which the limited liability company is a party; and

Shall make such provision as will be reasonably likely to be sufficient to provide compensation for claims that have not been made known to the limited liability company or that have not arisen but that, based on facts known to the limited liability company, are likely to arise or to become known to the limited liability company within three (3) years after the date of dissolution.

If there are sufficient assets, such claims and obligations shall be paid in full and any such provision for payment made shall be made in full.If there are insufficient assets, such claims and obligations shall be paid or provided for according to their priority and, among claims of equal priority, ratably to the extent of assets available therefor.Any remaining assets shall be distributed as provided in this chapter.Any liquidating trustee winding-up a limited liability company’s affairs who has complied with this section shall not be personally liable to the claimants of the dissolved limited liability company by reason of such person’s actions in winding-up the limited liability company.

A member who receives a distribution in violation of subsection (1) of this section, and who knew at the time of the distribution that the distribution violated subsection (1) of this section, shall be liable to the limited liability company for the amount of the distribution.For purposes of the immediately preceding sentence, the term “distribution” shall not include amounts constituting reasonable compensation for present or past services or reasonable payments made in the ordinary course of business pursuant to a bona fide retirement plan or other benefits program.A member who receives a distribution in violation of subsection (1) of this section, and who did not know at the time of the distribution that the distribution violated subsection (1) of this section, shall not be liable for the amount of the distribution. Subject to subsection (4) of this section, this subsection shall not affect any obligation or liability of a member under an agreement or other applicable law for the amount of a distribution.

Unless otherwise agreed, a member who receives a distribution from a limited liability company to which this section applies shall have no liability under this chapter or other applicable law for the amount of the distribution after the expiration of two (2) years from the date of the distribution unless an action to recover the distribution from such member is commenced prior to the expiration of the said two-year period and an adjudication of liability against such member is made in the said action.

Section 79-29-609 shall not apply to a distribution to which this section applies.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

Subject to this section, at the time a member becomes entitled to receive a distribution, he has the status of, and is entitled to all remedies available to, a creditor, see § 79-29-813.

§79-29-815.
Trustees or receivers for limited liability companies; appointment; powers; duties.

When the certificate of formation of any limited liability company formed under this chapter shall be dissolved by the filing of a certificate of dissolution, the chancery court, on application of any creditor, member or manager of the limited liability company, or any other person who shows good cause therefor, at any time, may either appoint one or more of the managers of the limited liability company to be trustees, or appoint one or more persons to be receivers, of and for the limited liability company, to take charge of the limited liability company’s property, and to collect the debts and property due and belonging to the limited liability company, with the power to prosecute and defend, in the name of the limited liability company, or otherwise, all such suits as may be necessary or proper for the purposes aforesaid, and to appoint an agent or agents under them, and to do all other acts which might be done by the limited liability company, if in being, that may be necessary for the final settlement of the unfinished business of the limited liability company.The powers of the trustees or receivers may be continued as long as the chancery court shall think necessary for the purposes aforesaid.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

§79-29-817.
Known claims against dissolved limited liability company.

A dissolved limited liability company may dispose of the known claims against it by filing a certificate of dissolution pursuant to Section 79-29-205 and following the procedure described in this section.

The dissolved limited liability company shall notify its known claimants in writing of the dissolution at any time after the effective date of the dissolution.The written notice must:

Describe information that must be included in a claim;

Provide a mailing address where a claim may be sent;

State the deadline, which may not be fewer than one hundred twenty (120) days from the latter of the mailing date of the written notice or the filing of a certificate of dissolution pursuant to Section 79-29-205, by which the dissolved limited liability company must receive the claim; and

State that the claim will be barred if not received by the deadline.

A claim against the dissolved limited liability company is barred:

If a claimant who was given written notice under subsection (2) of this section does not deliver the claim to the dissolved limited liability company by the deadline; or

If a claimant whose claim was rejected by the dissolved limited liability company does not commence a proceeding to enforce the claim within ninety (90) days from the date the claimant receives notice of the rejection of the claim.

For purposes of this section, “claim” does not include a contingent liability or a claim based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

§79-29-819.
Unknown claims against dissolved limited liability company.

A dissolved limited liability company may publish notice of its dissolution pursuant to this section which requests that persons with claims against the limited liability company present them in accordance with the notice.

The notice must:

Be published one time in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the dissolved limited liability company’s principal office is or was last located, or in Hinds County if the limited liability company does or did not have a principal office in this state;

Describe the information that must be included in a claim and provide a mailing address where the claim may be sent; and

State that a claim against the limited liability company not otherwise barred will be barred unless a proceeding to enforce the claim is commenced within three (3) years after the latter of the publication of the notice or the filing of a certificate of dissolution with respect to the limited liability company.

If the dissolved limited liability company publishes a newspaper notice in accordance with subsection (2) and files a certificate of dissolution pursuant to Section 79-29-205, the claim of each of the following claimants which is not otherwise barred is barred unless the claimant commences a proceeding to enforce the claim against the dissolved limited liability company within three (3) years after the latter of the publication date of the newspaper notice or the filing of the certificate of dissolution:

A claimant who did not receive written notice under Section 79-29-817;

A claimant whose claim was timely sent to the dissolved limited liability company but not acted on within the three-year period; and

A claimant whose claim is contingent or based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

A claim may be enforced under this section:

Against the dissolved limited liability company, to the extent of its undistributed assets; or

If the assets have been distributed in liquidation, against a member of the dissolved limited liability company to the extent of the member’s pro rata share of the claim or the assets of the limited liability company distributed to the member in liquidation, whichever is less, but a member’s total liability for all claims under this section may not exceed the total amount of assets distributed to the member, subject to Section 79-29-611(1).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 113, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “company’s principal office is or was last located, or in Hinds County if the limited liability company does or did not have a principal office in this state” for “company’s principal office, or, if none in this state, its registered office, is or was last located” in (2)(a).

§79-29-821.
Grounds for administrative dissolution.

The Secretary of State may commence a proceeding under Section 79-29-823 to administratively dissolve a limited liability company if:

The limited liability company does not pay within sixty (60) days after they are due any fees imposed by this chapter or other law;

The limited liability company does not deliver its annual report to the Secretary of State within sixty (60) days after it is due;

The limited liability company is without a registered agent in this state for sixty (60) days or more;

The limited liability company does not notify the Secretary of State within sixty (60) days that its registered agent has been changed or that its registered agent has resigned; or

The Department of Revenue notifies the Secretary of State that the limited liability company is delinquent in any payments or tax owed by the limited liability company to the State of Mississippi; or

A misrepresentation has been made of any material matter in any application, report, affidavit, or other record submitted by the limited liability company to the Secretary of State pursuant to this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

§79-29-823.
Procedure for administrative dissolution.

If the Secretary of State determines that one or more grounds exist under Section 79-29-821 for administratively dissolving a limited liability company, the Secretary of State shall serve the limited liability company with written notice of the determination under Section 79-35-13, except that such determination may be served by first-class mail.

If the limited liability company does not correct each ground for dissolution or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the Secretary of State that each ground determined by the Secretary of State does not exist within sixty (60) days after the service of the notice, the Secretary of State shall administratively dissolve the limited liability company by signing a certification of the administrative dissolution that recites the ground or grounds for dissolution and its effective date. The Secretary of State shall file the original of the certificate of administrative dissolution and serve the limited liability company with a copy of the certificate of administrative dissolution under Section 79-35-13, except that such certificate of administrative dissolution may be served by first-class mail.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 114, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “79-35-13” for “79-29-125” preceding “except that such” in (1) and (2).

§79-29-825.
Reinstatement following administrative dissolution.

A limited liability company administratively dissolved under Section 79-29-823 may apply to the Secretary of State for reinstatement at any time after the effective date of dissolution. The application must:

Recite the name of the limited liability company and the effective date of its administrative dissolution;

State that the ground or grounds for administrative dissolution either did not exist or have been eliminated; and

State that the limited liability company’s name satisfies the requirements of Section 79-29-109.

If the Secretary of State determines that the application contains the information required by subsection (1) of this section and that the information is correct, the Secretary of State shall cancel the certificate of administrative dissolution and prepare a certificate of reinstatement that recites this determination and the effective date of reinstatement, file the original of the certificate of reinstatement, and serve the limited liability company with a copy of the certificate of reinstatement under Section 79-35-13, except that such certificate of reinstatement may be served by first-class mail.

When the reinstatement is effective:

The reinstatement relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the administrative dissolution;

Any liability incurred by the limited liability company or a member after the administrative dissolution and before the reinstatement shall be determined as if the administrative dissolution had never occurred; and

The limited liability company may resume carrying on its business as if the administrative dissolution had never occurred.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 115, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “79-35-13” for “79-29-125” near the end of (2).

Limited liability company was not reinstated for the sole purpose of evading liability because it was reinstated after the homeowners filed their complaint; the statute is clear that the reinstatement relates back to the date of dissolution and any liability during this period is determined as if the dissolution never occurred. Brown v. Waldron, 186 So.3d 955, 2016 Miss. App. LEXIS 115 (Miss. Ct. App. 2016).

§79-29-827.
Appeal from denial of reinstatement.

If the Secretary of State denies a limited liability company’s application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution, the Secretary of State shall serve the limited liability company under Section 79-35-13 with a record that explains the reason or reasons for denial, except that such record may be served by first-class mail.

The limited liability company may appeal the denial of reinstatement to the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County or the chancery court where the limited liability company is domiciled within thirty (30) days after service of the notice of denial is perfected. The limited liability company appeals by petitioning the court to set aside the dissolution and attaching to the petition copies of the Secretary of State’s certificate of administrative dissolution, the limited liability company’s application for reinstatement, and the Secretary of State’s notice of denial.

The court may summarily order the Secretary of State to reinstate the dissolved limited liability company or may take other action the court considers appropriate.

The court’s final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 116, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “79-35-13” for “79-29-125” following “Section” in (1); and deleted “Mississippi” preceding “or the chancery court where the limited liability company” in (2).

§79-29-829.
Revocation of dissolution.

Notwithstanding the occurrence of an event set forth in Section 79-29-801(1)(a), (b), (c) or (d) of this chapter, the limited liability company shall not be dissolved and its affairs shall not be wound up if, within one hundred twenty (120) days of the effective date of the dissolution:

The limited liability company is continued pursuant to the affirmative majority vote or consent of all remaining members of the limited liability company or the personal representative of the last remaining member of the limited liability company if there is no remaining member, and any other person whose approval is required under the operating agreement to revoke a dissolution pursuant to this section; however, if the dissolution was caused by a vote or consent, the dissolution shall not be revoked unless each member and other person, or their respective personal representatives, who voted in favor of, or consented to, the dissolution has voted or consented to continue the limited liability company. If there is no remaining member of the limited liability company and the personal representative of the last remaining member votes in favor of or consents to the continuation of the limited liability company, the personal representative shall be required to agree in writing to the admission of the personal representative of the member or its nominee or designee to the limited liability company as a member, effective as of the occurrence of the event that terminated the continued membership of the last remaining member; and

The limited liability company delivers to the Secretary of State for filing a certificate of revocation of dissolution, together with a copy of certificate of dissolution, that sets forth:

The name of the limited liability company;

The effective date of the dissolution that was revoked; and

The date that the revocation of dissolution was authorized.

The revocation of dissolution is effective upon the date of the certificate of revocation of dissolution is filed, but the revocation shall relate back to and take effect as of the effective date of the dissolution and any liability incurred by the limited liability company or a member after the dissolution and before the revocation shall be determined as if the dissolution had never occurred; and the limited liability company may resume or continue carrying on its business as if the dissolution had never occurred.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

At the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation, a typographical error in the first sentence of (a) was corrected by deleting “and” preceding “however, if the dissolution.”

§79-29-831.
Effect of dissolution.

The dissolution of a limited liability company does not terminate the authority of the registered agent of the limited liability company.

The administrative dissolution of a limited liability company shall not impair the validity of any contract, deed, mortgage, security interest, lien or act of such limited liability company or prevent such limited liability company from defending any action, suit or proceeding with any court of this state.

A member, manager or officer of a limited liability company is not liable for the debts, obligations or liabilities of such limited liability company solely by reason of the administrative dissolution of a limited liability company.

A limited liability company that has been administratively dissolved may not maintain any action, suit or proceeding in any court of this state until such limited liability company is reinstated.An action, suit or proceeding may not be maintained in any court of this state by any successor or assignee of such limited liability company on any right, claim or demand arising out of the transaction of business by such limited liability company after the administrative dissolution.

A limited liability company that is dissolved pursuant to Section 79-29-801 or 79-29-803 continues its legal existence but may carry on only business necessary or appropriate to wind-up and liquidate its business and affairs under Section 79-29-809 and to notify claimants under Sections 79-29-817 and 79-29-819.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A typographical error in subsection (2) of this section has been corrected by substituting “...shall not impair the validity of any contract...” for “...shall not impair the validity on any contract...”. The Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication ratified the correction at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

Although a hospice care provider was a limited liability company that was administratively dissolved, the provider’s appeal of the Mississippi Division of Medicaid’s decision to demand that unsupported claims be repaid was allowed to proceed because the provider, by further appealing the decision, was not maintaining an action against Medicaid, but rather, continued to defend itself against Medicaid’s administrative decision. Genesis Hospice Care, LLC v. Miss. Div. of Medicaid, 267 So.3d 779, 2019 Miss. LEXIS 160 (Miss. 2019).